Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1641
Legislative intent.

(1) The Legislature finds that establishing certification of training programs for community health workers will strengthen Nebraska's public health and health care workforce, promote consistent standards of practice, and support improved access to preventive and primary care services.

(2) The purpose of the Community Health Worker Training Endorsement Act is to establish a consistent statewide process for recognizing community health worker training programs that meet minimum standards of quality and content and ensure that community health worker services are eligible for reimbursement by medicaid and private insurers.

Laws 2026, LB912, § 2.
July 18, 2026